Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 12 Rights and Duties of Teachers Generally

16-12-1.
“Teacher” defined.

The term “teacher,” as used in this chapter, is deemed to include every person employed as a teacher, supervisor, principal, or superintendent or assistant superintendent, of schools, whether employed in schools supported in whole or in part by public funds, or in colleges, or in public institutions, or in the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

16-12-1

.

16-12-2.
Employment of school committee member as teacher.

No member of the school committee of any town shall, so long as he or she continues in office as member of the school committee, be eligible or employed to teach as principal, supervisor, or assistant in any school supported entirely or in part by public money, or to serve as superintendent of schools, within the town in which the member of the school committee resides.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 61, § 6; P.L. 1899, ch. 620, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 7; P.L. 1916, ch. 1377, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-12-2

.

16-12-3.
Duty to cultivate principles of morality.

Every teacher shall aim to implant and cultivate in the minds of all children committed to his or her care the principles of morality and virtue.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 61, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

16-12-3

.

16-12-3.1.
Period of silent meditation.

At the opening of every school day in all grades in all public schools the teacher in charge of the room in which each class is held shall announce that a period of silence not to exceed one minute in duration shall be observed for meditation, and during this period silence shall be maintained and no activities engaged in.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 84, § 1.

16-12-4.
Register of pupils — Reports required by school authorities.

Every teacher in any public or private school shall keep a register of the names of all the students attending the school, their sex and age, names of parents or guardians, the time when each student enters and leaves the school, and their daily attendance, and shall prepare any report required by the school committee or department of elementary and secondary education.

The school committee may establish an alternative method of keeping the register provided that all required information is furnished to the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 61, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 6; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-12-4

; P.L. 1976, ch. 150, § 1.

16-12-5.
Minimum salary.

The annual salary of any teacher employed on a full time basis in any public school shall not be less than twelve hundred dollars ($1,200).

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 13; P.L. 1945, ch. 1607, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-12-5

.

16-12-6.
Dismissal of teachers.

The school committee of any town may, on reasonable notice and hearing, dismiss any teacher for refusal to conform to the regulations made by the committee, or for other just cause.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 61, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 5; P.L. 1938, ch. 2641, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 5; P.L. 1941, ch. 1033, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-12-6

; P.L. 2009, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 317, § 1.

16-12-6.1.
Special rules as to Cumberland.

The school committee of the town of Cumberland in electing teachers shall elect to serve at its discretion all teachers who have served in the schools under its direction for the previous three (3) consecutive school years; provided, that the school committee of the town of Cumberland may elect to serve at its discretion any person who has served more than one previous consecutive year. The school committee of the town of Cumberland may dismiss a teacher within the year of employment in the instance of teachers not employed at discretion, and at any time in the instance of teachers employed at discretion by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the whole school committee for cause, which may be a violation of law, flagrant or persistent violation of the rules and regulations legally prescribed by the school committee, inefficiency, incapacity, insubordination, conduct unbecoming a teacher, or other just cause; provided, that no teacher shall be dismissed unless he or she has received a written copy of the charge or charges against him or her not less than thirty (30) days before the meeting at which the charge or charges are to be considered, and unless the teacher if he or she so requests it has been given a hearing before the school committee, and unless the charge or charges has or have been admitted or substantiated; and provided, further, that nothing in this section shall prevent the retirement of any teacher under a rule of the school committee affecting marriage or for the purpose of chapter 15 of this title; or the retirement at the end of any school year of any teacher whose services may no longer be required by reason of the closing of schools or the discontinuance of classes; and provided, further, that the school committee of the town of Cumberland may suspend any teacher for cause pending a hearing, but that suspension shall not involve loss of salary unless the cause is sufficient to justify dismissal as provided in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 316, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 317, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 364, § 1.

16-12-7.
Maximum school year in state schools.

No teacher as defined in this section shall be required to teach classes in any of the state institutions named in this section for a maximum of more than one hundred and ninety (190) days in any one school year.

The term “teacher” as used in this section is deemed to mean every person for whose position a certificate issued by the department of elementary and secondary education is required by law, and who is, or may be, employed by the state in a teaching capacity in any of the various correctional, medical, educational, mental, and any other types of similar public institutions owned and operated by this state.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 157, §§ 1, 2.

16-12-8.
Extension of general laws to include certified teachers in state schools.

The general laws which apply to certified teachers in the cities and towns shall apply equally to certified teachers in state schools.

The provisions of §

16-60-7.2

shall also apply equally to certified teachers in state schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 503, § 1.

16-12-9.
Residency within municipality not required.

Notwithstanding any prior ratification and validation by the general assembly of any home rule charter provision requiring that a public school department employee reside within the employing city or town, effective September 1, 2001, no home rule charter provision shall require that a public school department employee reside within the city or town as a condition of appointment or continued employment. Any prior ratification and validation by the general assembly of a home rule charter provision requiring residency within a city or town as a condition for employment of a public school department employee is expressly repealed by the general assembly. Nor shall any town or city council make or ordain any ordinance requiring that a public school department employee reside within the employing city or town as a condition of appointment or continued employment. Any existing ordinance requiring that a public school department employee reside within the employing city or town as a condition of appointment or continued employment is considered contrary to the laws of this state and is thus void as violative of state law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 146, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 310, § 1.

16-12-10.
Immunity for reports of suspected substance abuse.

Any teacher, school administrator, school guidance counselor, school psychologist, school drug counselor, school nurse, supervisor of attendance, attendance teacher, or attendance officer having reasonable cause to suspect that an elementary or secondary school student is abusing a controlled substance or alcohol, or is under the influence of a dangerous drug or alcohol, or has in his or her possession a controlled substance or alcohol, who reports this information to the appropriate elementary or secondary school officials pursuant to the school’s drug policy, or if the school has no drug policy to the school’s principal or the parents of the student under eighteen (18) years of age, or to a police agency, shall have immunity from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of the making of the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 317, § 1.

16-12-11.
Educator evaluations.

Any board of education-approved educator evaluation system for tenured teachers shall include, but not be limited to, the following provisions:

Any teacher who obtains or earns a rating of “highly effective,” or a number “4,” or any equivalent thereof shall, subsequent to such evaluation, be evaluated not more than once every three (3) years thereafter.

Any teacher who obtains or earns a rating of “effective,” or a number “3,” or any equivalent thereof shall, subsequent to such evaluation, be evaluated not more than once every two (2) years thereafter.

An annual conference shall be required for any “highly effective” or “effective” teacher included in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) herein. Said conference shall be in accordance with a process and scope determined by each school district’s educator evaluation committee.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit annual evaluations in circumstances including, but not limited to:

Any teacher who may request an annual evaluation; or

Any teacher during his or her first year teaching under a new teaching certificate.

Any non-tenured teacher shall be evaluated annually.

Notwithstanding the provisions contained in subsection (a), principals may observe a teacher’s classroom and classroom instruction at any time.

Notwithstanding the provisions contained in subsection (a), nothing herein shall preclude more frequent educator evaluations if they are included in a local school district’s negotiated collective bargaining agreement entered into after July 1, 2014.

Notwithstanding the provisions contained in subsection (a), any concerns about a teacher’s performance that arise at anytime shall be handled in accordance with local school district personnel policies and negotiated collective bargaining agreements.

Any regulations of the department of education providing for the evaluation of teachers shall be modified to conform with the provisions and schedule set forth herein; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to direct the department of education to act so as to jeopardize any current funding from a race to the top grant received by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 470, § 1.